Oklahoma, session 2025, SB115.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 18 O.S. 2021, Section 2055.3, as


amended by Section 22, Chapter 121, O.S.L. 2024 (18 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 2055.3), is amended to read as follows:


Section 2055.3.


REINSTATEMENT OF A LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY OR REGISTERED SERIES


A. A domestic limited liability company or registered series


not in good standing for failure to file an annual certificate and


pay the annual certificate fees or registered agent fees, including


a domestic limited liability company or registered series whose


articles of organization or registered series have been canceled


under subsection B of Section 2012.1 of this title, or a foreign

Req. No. 70 Page 1


limited liability company or registered series whose registration


was withdrawn for failure to file an annual certificate and pay the


annual certificate fees or registered agent fees may apply to the


Secretary of State for reinstatement by:


1. Filing all delinquent annual certificates with the Secretary


of State and paying all delinquent annual certificate fees or paying


all delinquent registered agent fees to the Secretary of State; and


2. Filing an application for reinstatement with the Secretary


of State stating its name at the time it ceased to be in good


standing or was withdrawn, the date it ceased to be in good standing


or was withdrawn, and its current name, if its name at the time it


ceased to be in good standing or was withdrawn is no longer


available under Section 2008 or 2045 of this title.


If the Secretary of State determines that the application


contains the required information, the information is correct, all


delinquent certificates or other filings are submitted, all


delinquent fees are paid, and the name satisfies the requirements of


Section 2008 or 2045 of this title, the Secretary of State shall


accept the application for reinstatement and issue a certificate of


reinstatement in the manner provided in Section 2007 of this title


for domestic limited liability companies, Section 14 2054.5 of this


act title for domestic registered series, or Section 2044 of this


title for foreign limited liability companies or foreign registered


series. If the limited liability company or registered series is

Req. No. 70 Page 2


required to change its name because its name at the time it ceased


to be in good standing or was withdrawn is no longer available,


acceptance of the reinstatement shall constitute an amendment to the


domestic limited liability company’s articles of organization or the


domestic registered series’ articles of registered series to change


its name or the adoption of a fictitious name by the foreign limited


liability company or registered series, as applicable. The


application for reinstatement may amend the articles of organization


of the domestic limited liability company or the articles of


registered series of the registered series or the application for


registration of the foreign limited liability company or registered


series, subject in either case to the payment of the additional fee


required in Section 2055 of this title for amendments; provided,


that the application may not extend the term of a limited liability


company or registered series that had expired before the application


for reinstatement. For purposes of this section, a foreign limited


liability company or registered series applying for reinstatement is


deemed to have done business continually in the state following the


administrative withdrawal.


B. When reinstatement under this section has become effective,


the reinstatement relates back to and takes effect as if the


domestic limited liability company or registered series had never


ceased to be in good standing and as if its articles of organization


or articles of registered series, as the case may be, had never been

Req. No. 70 Page 3


canceled, or as if the foreign limited liability or registered


series registration was never withdrawn.


C. The failure of a domestic limited liability company or


registered series or foreign limited liability company or registered


series to file an annual certificate and pay an annual certificate


fee or a registered agent fee to the Secretary of State shall not


impair the validity on any contract, deed, mortgage, security


interest, lien or act of the domestic limited liability company or


registered series or foreign limited liability company or registered


series or prevent the domestic limited liability company or


registered series or foreign limited liability company or registered


series from defending any action, suit or proceeding with any court


of this state.


D. All real and personal property, and all rights and


interests, which belonged to the domestic limited liability company


or registered series at the time its articles of organization or


articles of registered series, as the case may be, were canceled or


which were acquired by the limited liability company or registered


series after cancellation, and which were not disposed of before its


reinstatement, shall be vested in the limited liability company or


registered series after its reinstatement as fully as they were held


by the limited liability company or registered series at, and after,


as the case may be, the time its articles of organization or


articles of registered series were canceled.

Req. No. 70 Page 4


E. A member or manager of a domestic limited liability company


or registered series or foreign limited liability company or


registered series is not liable for the debts, obligations or


liabilities of the domestic limited liability company or registered


series or foreign limited liability company or registered series


solely by reason of the failure of the domestic limited liability


company or registered series or foreign limited liability company or


registered series to file an annual certificate and pay an annual


certificate fee or a registered agent fee to the Secretary of State


or by reason of the domestic limited liability company or registered


series ceasing to be in good standing or its articles of


organization or articles of registered series being canceled or the


foreign limited liability company or registered series ceasing to be


duly registered, unless the member or manager knew or should have


known that the company ceased to be in good standing, that the


articles of organization had been canceled, or that the company


ceased to be duly registered, and the limited liability company does


not have sufficient net assets to cover the obligations at the time


the member or manager bound the company to the liability.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-70 TEK 12/26/2024 10:21:33 AM





Req. No. 70 Page 5